Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202081-5,232
Elevator contractor license; work experience required.

An applicant for an elevator contractor license shall demonstrate five years' work experience in the conveyance industry in construction, maintenance, and service or repair, as verified by current or previous employers.

Laws 2006, LB 489, § 23;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-2523;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 68.